Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4501
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-4501 to 43-4514 shall be known and may be cited as the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act.

Laws 2013, LB216, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 30;

Laws 2015, LB243, § 14.